Utah statutes.
70A-2a-105.   Territorial application to goods covered by certificate of title.

Subject to the provisions of Subsections 70A-2a-304(3) and 70A-2a-305(3), with respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction, compliance and the effect of compliance or noncompliance with a certificate of title statute are governed by the law, including the conflict of laws rules, of the jurisdiction issuing the certificate until the earlier of surrender of the certificate or four months after the goods are removed from that jurisdiction, and thereafter until a new certificate of title is issued by another jurisdiction.

